District of Columbia statutes.
47-339

Preliminary capital budget and multiyear capital improvements plan.

On or before January 10 of each year, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a preliminary capital budget for the next fiscal year and a preliminary multiyear capital improvements plan.

History

May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-126, § 5, 41 DCR 1814
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-339.